Florida, session 2026, SB1404.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 44 45 Section 1.âPresent subsections (15) through (28) of section 46 429.02, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (17) 47 through (30), respectively, new subsections (15) and (16) are 48 added to that section, and subsection (12) of that section is 49 amended, to read: 50 429.02âDefinitions.âWhen used in this part, the term: 51 (12)ââExtended congregate careâ means acts beyond those 52 authorized in subsection (20) (18) which may be performed 53 pursuant to part I of chapter 464 by persons licensed thereunder 54 while carrying out their professional duties, and other 55 supportive services that may be specified by rule. The purpose 56 of such services is to enable residents to age in place in a 57 residential environment despite mental or physical limitations 58 that might otherwise disqualify them from residency in a 59 facility licensed under this part. 60 (15)ââMemory care residentâ means a person who suffers from 61 Alzheimerâs disease or a related dementia who is a resident of 62 an assisted living facility that claims or otherwise represents 63 that it provides specialized care, services, or activities 64 specifically to support such residentâs Alzheimerâs disease or 65 related dementia, irrespective of whether such care, services, 66 or activities were listed in the residentâs contract. 67 (16)ââMemory care servicesâ means specific specialized or 68 focused care, services, or activities an assisted living 69 facility agrees to provide to a memory care resident to support 70 his or her Alzheimerâs disease or related dementia. Such 71 services do not include services, care, or activities provided 72 by the assisted living facility as supportive services, as 73 defined in subsection (29), that are optional and available to 74 all residents of the facility. 75 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 429.07, Florida 76 Statutes, is amended to read: 77 429.07âLicense required; fee.â 78 (3)âIn addition to the requirements of s. 408.806, each 79 license granted by the agency must state the type of care for 80 which the license is granted. Licenses shall be issued for one 81 or more of the following categories of care: standard, extended 82 congregate care, limited nursing services, or limited mental 83 health, or memory care services. 84 (a)âA standard license shall be issued to facilities 85 providing one or more of the personal services identified in s. 86 429.02. Such facilities may also employ or contract with a 87 person licensed under part I of chapter 464 to administer 88 medications and perform other tasks as specified in s. 429.255. 89 (b)âAn extended congregate care license shall be issued to 90 each facility that has been licensed as an assisted living 91 facility for 2 or more years and that provides services, 92 directly or through contract, beyond those authorized in 93 paragraph (a), including services performed by persons licensed 94 under part I of chapter 464 and supportive services, as defined 95 by rule, to persons who would otherwise be disqualified from 96 continued residence in a facility licensed under this part. An 97 extended congregate care license may be issued to a facility 98 that has a provisional extended congregate care license and 99 meets the requirements for licensure under subparagraph 2. The 100 primary purpose of extended congregate care services is to allow 101 residents the option of remaining in a familiar setting from 102 which they would otherwise be disqualified for continued 103 residency as they become more impaired. A facility licensed to 104 provide extended congregate care services may also admit an 105 individual who exceeds the admission criteria for a facility 106 with a standard license, if he or she is determined appropriate 107 for admission to the extended congregate care facility. 108 1.âIn order for extended congregate care services to be 109 provided, the agency must first determine that all requirements 110 established in law and rule are met and must specifically 111 designate, on the facilityâs license, that such services may be 112 provided and whether the designation applies to all or part of 113 the facility. This designation may be made at the time of 114 initial licensure or relicensure, or upon request in writing by 115 a licensee under this part and part II of chapter 408. The 116 notification of approval or the denial of the request shall be 117 made in accordance with part II of chapter 408. Each existing 118 facility that qualifies to provide extended congregate care 119 services must have maintained a standard license and may not 120 have been subject to administrative sanctions during the 121 previous 2 years, or since initial licensure if the facility has 122 been licensed for less than 2 years, for any of the following 123 reasons: 124 a.âA class I or class II violation; 125 b.âThree or more repeat or recurring class III violations 126 of identical or similar resident care standards from which a 127 pattern of noncompliance is found by the agency; 128 c.âThree or more class III violations that were not 129 corrected in accordance with the corrective action plan approved 130 by the agency; 131 d.âViolation of resident care standards which results in 132 requiring the facility to employ the services of a consultant 133 pharmacist or consultant dietitian; 134 e.âDenial, suspension, or revocation of a license for 135 another facility licensed under this part in which the applicant 136 for an extended congregate care license has at least 25 percent 137 ownership interest; or 138 f.âImposition of a moratorium pursuant to this part or part 139 II of chapter 408 or initiation of injunctive proceedings. 140 141 The agency may deny or revoke a facilityâs extended congregate 142 care license for not meeting the criteria for an extended 143 congregate care license as provided in this subparagraph. 144 2.âIf an assisted living facility has been licensed for 145 less than 2 years, the initial extended congregate care license 146 must be provisional and may not exceed 6 months. The licensee 147 shall notify the agency, in writing, when it has admitted at 148 least one extended congregate care resident, after which an 149 unannounced inspection shall be made to determine compliance 150 with the requirements of an extended congregate care license. A 151 licensee with a provisional extended congregate care license 152 which demonstrates compliance with all the requirements of an 153 extended congregate care license during the inspection shall be 154 issued an extended congregate care license. In addition to 155 sanctions authorized under this part, if violations are found 156 during the inspection and the licensee fails to demonstrate 157 compliance with all assisted living facility requirements during 158 a follow-up followup inspection, the licensee shall immediately 159 suspend extended congregate care services, and the provisional 160 extended congregate care license expires. The agency may extend 161 the provisional license for not more than 1 month in order to 162 complete a follow-up followup visit. 163 3.âA facility that is licensed to provide extended 164 congregate care services shall maintain a written progress 165 report on each person who receives such nursing services from 166 the facilityâs staff which describes the type, amount, duration, 167 scope, and outcome of services that are rendered and the general 168 status of the residentâs health. A registered nurse, or 169 appropriate designee, representing the agency shall visit the 170 facility at least twice a year to monitor residents who are 171 receiving extended congregate care services and to determine if 172 the facility is in compliance with this part, part II of chapter 173 408, and relevant rules. One of the visits may be in conjunction 174 with the regular survey. The monitoring visits may be provided 175 through contractual arrangements with appropriate community 176 agencies. A registered nurse shall serve as part of the team 177 that inspects the facility. The agency may waive one of the 178 required yearly monitoring visits for a facility that has: 179 a.âHeld an extended congregate care license for at least 24 180 months; 181 b.âNo class I or class II violations and no uncorrected 182 class III violations; and 183 c.âNo ombudsman council complaints that resulted in a 184 citation for licensure. 185 4.âA facility that is licensed to provide extended 186 congregate care services must: 187 a.âDemonstrate the capability to meet unanticipated 188 resident service needs. 189 b.âOffer a physical environment that promotes a homelike 190 setting, provides for resident privacy, promotes resident 191 independence, and allows sufficient congregate space as defined 192 by rule. 193 c.âHave sufficient staff available, taking into account the 194 physical plant and firesafety features of the building, to 195 assist with the evacuation of residents in an emergency. 196 d.âAdopt and follow policies and procedures that maximize 197 resident independence, dignity, choice, and decisionmaking to 198 permit residents to age in place, so that moves due to changes 199 in functional status are minimized or avoided. 200 e.âAllow residents or, if applicable, a residentâs 201 representative, designee, surrogate, guardian, or attorney in 202 fact to make a variety of personal choices, participate in 203 developing service plans, and share responsibility in 204 decisionmaking. 205 f.âImplement the concept of managed risk. 206 g.âProvide, directly or through contract, the services of a 207 person licensed under part I of chapter 464. 208 h.âIn addition to the training mandated in s. 429.52, 209 provide specialized training as defined by rule for facility 210 staff. 211 5.âA facility that is licensed to provide extended 212 congregate care services is exempt from the criteria for 213 continued residency set forth in rules adopted under s. 429.41. 214 A licensed facility must adopt its own requirements within 215 guidelines for continued residency set forth by rule. However, 216 the facility may not serve residents who require 24-hour nursing 217 supervision. A licensed facility that provides extended 218 congregate care services must also provide each resident with a 219 written copy of facility policies governing admission and 220 retention. 221 6.âBefore the admission of an individual to a facility 222 licensed to provide extended congregate care services, the 223 individual must undergo a medical examination as provided in s. 224 429.26(5) and the facility must develop a preliminary service 225 plan for the individual. 226 7.âIf a facility can no longer provide or arrange for 227 services in accordance with the residentâs service plan and 228 needs and the facilityâs policy, the facility must make 229 arrangements for relocating the person in accordance with s. 230 429.28(1)(k). 231 (c)âA limited nursing services license shall be issued to a 232 facility that provides services beyond those authorized in 233 paragraph (a) and as specified in this paragraph. 234 1.âIn order for limited nursing services to be provided in 235 a facility licensed under this part, the agency must first 236 determine that all requirements established in law and rule are 237 met and must specifically designate, on the facilityâs license, 238 that such services may be provided. This designation may be made 239 at the time of initial licensure or licensure renewal, or upon 240 request in writing by a licensee under this part and part II of 241 chapter 408. Notification of approval or denial of such request 242 shall be made in accordance with part II of chapter 408. An 243 existing facility that qualifies to provide limited nursing 244 services must have maintained a standard license and may not 245 have been subject to administrative sanctions that affect the 246 health, safety, and welfare of residents for the previous 2 247 years or since initial licensure if the facility has been 248 licensed for less than 2 years. 249 2.âA facility that is licensed to provide limited nursing 250 services shall maintain a written progress report on each person 251 who receives such nursing services from the facilityâs staff. 252 The report must describe the type, amount, duration, scope, and 253 outcome of services that are rendered and the general status of 254 the residentâs health. A registered nurse representing the 255 agency shall visit the facility at least annually to monitor 256 residents who are receiving limited nursing services and to 257 determine if the facility is in compliance with applicable 258 provisions of this part, part II of chapter 408, and related 259 rules. The monitoring visits may be provided through contractual 260 arrangements with appropriate community agencies. A registered 261 nurse shall also serve as part of the team that inspects such 262 facility. Visits may be in conjunction with other agency 263 inspections. The agency may waive the required yearly monitoring 264 visit for a facility that has: 265 a.âHad a limited nursing services license for at least 24 266 months; 267 b.âNo class I or class II violations and no uncorrected 268 class III violations; and 269 c.âNo ombudsman council complaints that resulted in a 270 citation for licensure. 271 3.âA person who receives limited nursing services under 272 this part must meet the admission criteria established by the 273 agency for assisted living facilities. When a resident no longer 274 meets the admission criteria for a facility licensed under this 275 part, arrangements for relocating the person shall be made in 276 accordance with s. 429.28(1)(k), unless the facility is licensed 277 to provide extended congregate care services. 278 Section 3.âSection 429.076, Florida Statutes, is created to 279 read: 280 429.076âMemory care services license.âAn assisted living 281 facility that serves one or more memory care residents, or that 282 advertises or otherwise holds itself out as providing memory 283 care services, must obtain a memory care services license 284 pursuant to subsection (3) or subsection (4), as applicable. A 285 facility is not required to obtain a memory care services 286 license if the facility solely provides supportive services, as 287 defined in s. 429.02, for residents with Alzheimerâs disease and 288 related dementias which are optional and available to all 289 residents of the facility so long as the facility complies with 290 agency rules on advertising pursuant to paragraph (2)(h). 291 (1)âTo obtain a memory care services license, an assisted 292 living facility must maintain a standard assisted living 293 facility license and meet any additional minimum requirements 294 adopted by rule. A memory care services license must be renewed 295 at the same time as the facilityâs standard license. 296 (2)âBy June 1, 2027, the agency shall adopt rules to 297 provide minimum standards for memory care services licenses. 298 Such rules must include, but are not limited to: 299 (a)âPolicies and procedures for providing memory care 300 services. 301 (b)âStandardized admittance criteria for memory care 302 residents. 303 (c)âThe minimum level of care, services, and activities 304 that must be provided to memory care residents. 305 (d)âMinimum training requirements for staff at a facility 306 with a memory care services license, which must meet or exceed 307 training requirements established in s. 430.5025. 308 (e)âSafety requirements specific to memory care residents, 309 including, but not limited to, requiring a memory care services 310 licensee to maintain at least one awake staff member to be on 311 duty at all hours. 312 (f)âPhysical plant requirements for a facility, or parts of 313 a facility as specified by the licensee, serving memory care 314 residents. 315 (g)âRequirements for contracts with memory care residents 316 which, in addition to the requirements established by s. 429.24, 317 must require a memory care services licensee to specify the 318 memory care services that will be provided to the memory care 319 resident. 320 (h)âSpecified terms or terminologies that a facility may 321 not use in its advertising without obtaining a memory care 322 services license. Such terms include, but are not limited to, 323 memory care, memory care facility, memory care services, memory 324 care residents, dementia care, dementia care facility, 325 Alzheimerâs care, and Alzheimerâs care facility. A facility that 326 is not licensed to provide memory care services may advertise 327 the supportive services, as defined in s. 429.02, it provides 328 for persons with Alzheimerâs disease and related dementias so 329 long as such advertisements do not use any terms or terminology 330 prohibited by the agencyâs rules pursuant to this subsection, 331 such advertisements do not make any claim that the facility 332 provides memory care services, and the facility maintains a copy 333 of such advertisements in its records. The agency shall examine 334 all such advertisements in the facilityâs records as part of its 335 licensure renewal procedure. 336 (i)âRequirements that a facility must meet to continue to 337 serve memory care residents without obtaining a memory care 338 services license pursuant to subsection (5). 339 (3)âAn assisted living facility licensed on or after the 340 effective date of the rules required by subsection (2) must 341 obtain a memory care services license to provide memory care 342 services, serve memory care residents, or advertise or hold 343 itself out as providing memory care services or otherwise 344 serving memory care residents. 345 (4)âExcept as provided in subsection (5), an assisted 346 living facility licensed before the effective date of the rules 347 required by subsection (2) must obtain a memory care services 348 license within 6 months after the effective date of such rules 349 in order to begin or continue to provide memory care services, 350 serve memory care residents, or advertise or hold itself out as 351 providing such services or serving such residents. 352 (5)(a)âA facility that serves one or more memory care 353 residents accepted before the effective date of the rules 354 required by subsection (2) may continue to serve such memory 355 care residents and provide memory care services to such 356 residents without obtaining a memory care services license if 357 the facility: 358 1.âDemonstrates to the agency that it is unable to 359 reasonably obtain such license. 360 2.âNotifies any memory care residents the facility serves 361 and their caregivers, if applicable, that: 362 a.âThe facility is required to obtain a memory care 363 services license; 364 b.âThe facility is unable to obtain such license; and 365 c.âThe memory care resident may relocate to a facility with 366 a memory care services license, if desired. 367 3.âUpon request, assists memory care residents or, if 368 applicable, their caregivers with finding a suitable alternate 369 facility. 370 4.âNo longer accepts any new memory care residents without 371 first obtaining a memory care services license. 372 (b)âIf, after receiving the notice required by subparagraph 373 (a)2., a memory care resident or, if applicable, his or her 374 caregiver decides that the resident will remain at the facility, 375 the facility must: 376 1.âAmend the residentâs contract to include the memory care 377 services that are being provided to the resident; 378 2.âMaintain records pertaining to when and how such 379 services were provided to the resident; and 380 3.âProvide such records to the resident, his or her 381 caregivers, or the agency upon request. 382 (c)âThis subsection may not be construed to exempt a 383 facility from meeting any other requirements in law or rule as 384 applicable to the facility, including, but not limited to, 385 requirements related to the appropriateness of placements for 386 residents of the facility established in s. 429.26. 387 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 429.17, Florida 388 Statutes, is amended to read: 389 429.17âExpiration of license; renewal; conditional 390 license.â 391 (1)âLimited nursing, extended congregate care, and limited 392 mental health licenses, and memory care services shall expire at 393 the same time as the facilityâs standard license, regardless of 394 when issued. 395 Section 5.âEffective upon the adoption of rules 396 establishing minimum standards for memory care services 397 licensees pursuant to s. 429.076, Florida Statutes, ss. 429.177 398 and 429.178, Florida Statutes, are repealed. 399 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.